Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.42.030

Continuity of government—Enemy attack.

In the event that the mayor, manager or other chief executive officer of any code city is unavailable by reason of enemy attack to exercise the powers and to discharge the duties of his or her office, his or her successor or substitute shall be selected in the manner provided by RCW 42.14.050 subject to rules and regulations providing for the appointment of temporary interim successors adopted under RCW 42.14.070.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3040; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.42.030.]